Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4751.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to define civil rights; to prohibit discriminatory practices, policies, and customs in the exercise of those rights based upon religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, height, weight, familial status, or marital status; to preserve the confidentiality of records regarding arrest, detention, or other disposition in which a conviction does not result; to prescribe the powers and duties of the civil rights commission and the department of civil rights; to provide remedies and penalties; to provide for fees; and to repeal certain acts and parts of acts. Sec. 102. (1) The opportunity to obtain employment, housing and other real estate, and the full and equal utilization of public accommodations, public service, and educational facilities without discrimination because of religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, height, weight, familial status, or marital status as prohibited by this act, is recognized and declared to be a civil right. (2) This section does not prevent an individual from bringing or continuing an action arising out of sex discrimination before July 18, 1980 for a claim based on conduct similar to or identical to harassment. (3) This section does not prevent an individual from bringing or continuing an action arising out of discrimination based on familial status before June 29, 1992 for a claim based on conduct similar to or identical to discrimination because of the age of anyone residing with the individual bringing or continuing the action. Sec. 103. As used in this act: (a) "Age" means chronological age except as otherwise provided by law. (b) "Commission" means the civil rights commission established by section 29 of article V of the state constitution of 1963. (c) "Commissioner" means a member of the commission. (d) "Department" means the department of civil rights or its employees. (e) "Familial status" means 1 or more individuals under the age of 18 residing with a parent or other person having custody or in the process of securing legal custody of the individual or individuals or residing with the designee of the parent or other person having or securing custody, with the written permission of the parent or other person. For purposes of this definition, "parent" includes an individual who is pregnant. (f) "Gender identity or expression" means having or being perceived as having a gender-related self-identity or expression whether or not associated with an individual's assigned sex at birth. (f) (g) "National origin" includes the national origin of an ancestor. (g) (h) "Person" means an individual, agent, association, corporation, joint apprenticeship committee, joint stock company, labor organization, legal representative, mutual company, partnership, receiver, trust, trustee in bankruptcy, unincorporated organization, this state or a political subdivision of this state or an agency of this state, or any other legal or commercial entity. (h) (i) "Political subdivision" means a county, city, village, township, school district, or special district or authority of this state. (i) (j) "Race" is inclusive of traits historically associated with race, including, but not limited to, hair texture and protective hairstyles. For purposes of this definition, "protective hairstyles" includes, but is not limited to, such hairstyles as braids, locks, and twists. (j) (k) Discrimination because of sex includes sexual harassment. Sexual harassment means unwelcome sexual advances, requests for sexual favors, and other verbal or physical conduct or communication of a sexual nature under the following conditions: (i) Submission to the conduct or communication is made a term or condition either explicitly or implicitly to obtain employment, public accommodations or public services, education, or housing. (ii) Submission to or rejection of the conduct or communication by an individual is used as a factor in decisions affecting the individual's employment, public accommodations or public services, education, or housing. (iii) The conduct or communication has the purpose or effect of substantially interfering with an individual's employment, public accommodations or public services, education, or housing, or creating an intimidating, hostile, or offensive employment, public accommodations, public services, educational, or housing environment. (l) "Sexual orientation" means having an orientation for heterosexuality, homosexuality, or bisexuality or having a history of such an orientation or being identified with such an orientation. Sec. 202. (1) An employer shall not do any of the following: (a) Fail or refuse to hire or recruit, discharge, or otherwise discriminate against an individual with respect to employment, compensation, or a term, condition, or privilege of employment, because of religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, height, weight, or marital status. (b) Limit, segregate, or classify an employee or applicant for employment in a way that deprives or tends to deprive the employee or applicant of an employment opportunity or otherwise adversely affects the status of the employee or applicant because of religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, height, weight, or marital status. (c) Segregate, classify, or otherwise discriminate against an individual on the basis of sex with respect to a term, condition, or privilege of employment, including, but not limited to, a benefit plan or system. (d) Treat an individual affected by pregnancy, childbirth, the termination of a pregnancy, or a related medical condition differently for any employment-related purpose from another individual who is not so affected but similar in ability or inability to work, without regard to the source of any condition affecting the other individual's ability or inability to work. (2) This section does not prohibit the establishment or implementation of a bona fide retirement policy or system that is not a subterfuge to evade the purposes of this section. (3) This section does not apply to the employment of an individual by the individual's parent, spouse, or child. Sec. 203. An employment agency shall not fail or refuse to procure, refer, recruit, or place for employment, or otherwise discriminate against, an individual because of religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, height, weight, or marital status; or classify or refer for employment an individual on the basis of religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, height, weight, or marital status. Sec. 204. A labor organization shall not do any of the following: (a) Exclude or expel from membership, or otherwise discriminate against, a member or applicant for membership because of religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, height, weight, or marital status. (b) Limit, segregate, or classify membership or applicants for membership, or classify or fail or refuse to refer for employment an individual in a way that would deprive or tend to deprive that individual of an employment opportunity, or that would limit an employment opportunity, or that would adversely affect wages, hours, or employment conditions, or otherwise adversely affect the status of an employee or an applicant for employment, because of religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, height, weight, or marital status. (c) Cause or attempt to cause an employer to violate this article. (d) Fail to fairly and adequately represent a member in a grievance process because of religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, height, weight, or marital status. Sec. 205. An employer, labor organization, or joint labor-management committee controlling an apprenticeship, on the job, or other training or retraining program, shall not discriminate against an individual because of religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, height, weight, or marital status, in admission to, or employment or continuation in, a program established to provide apprenticeship on the job, or other training or retraining. Sec. 206. (1) An employer, labor organization, or employment agency shall not print, circulate, post, mail, or otherwise cause to be published a statement, advertisement, notice, or sign relating to employment by the employer, or relating to membership in or a classification or referral for employment by the labor organization, or relating to a classification or referral for employment by the employment agency, that indicates a preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination, based on religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, height, weight, or marital status. (2) Except as permitted by rules promulgated by the commission or by applicable federal law, an employer or employment agency shall not do any of the following: (a) Make or use a written or oral inquiry or form of application that elicits or attempts to elicit information concerning the religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, height, weight, or marital status of a prospective employee. (b) Make or keep a record of information described in subdivision (a) or disclose that information. (c) Make or use a written or oral inquiry or form of application that expresses a preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination based on religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, height, weight, or marital status of a prospective employee. Sec. 207. An individual seeking employment shall not publish or cause to be published a notice or advertisement that specifies or indicates the individual's religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, height, weight, or marital status, or expresses a preference, specification, limitation, or discrimination as to the religion, race, color, national origin, age, height, weight, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or marital status of a prospective employer. Sec. 209. A contract to which this state, a political subdivision, or an agency of this state or of a political subdivision is a party must contain a covenant by the contractor and the contractor's subcontractors not to discriminate against an employee or applicant for employment with respect to hire, tenure, terms, conditions, or privileges of employment, or a matter directly or indirectly related to employment, because of race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, height, weight, or marital status. Breach of this covenant may be regarded as a material breach of the contract. Sec. 302. Except where permitted by law, a person shall not do any of the following: (a) Deny an individual the full and equal enjoyment of the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations of a place of public accommodation or public service because of religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or marital status. (b) Print, circulate, post, mail, or otherwise cause to be published a statement, advertisement, notice, or sign that indicates that the full and equal enjoyment of the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations of a place of public accommodation or public service will be refused, withheld from, or denied an individual because of religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or marital status, or that an individual's patronage of or presence at a place of public accommodation is objectionable, unwelcome, unacceptable, or undesirable because of religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or marital status. Sec. 302a. (1) This section applies to a private club that is defined as a place of public accommodation under section 301(a). (2) If a private club allows use of its facilities by 1 or more adults per membership, the use must be equally available to all adults entitled to use the facilities under the membership. All classes of membership must be available without regard to race, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, religion, marital status, or national origin. Memberships that permit use during restricted times may be allowed only if the restricted times apply to all adults using that membership. (3) A private club that has food or beverage facilities or services shall allow equal access to those facilities and services for all adults in all membership categories at all times. This subsection does not require service or access to facilities to persons that would violate any law or ordinance regarding sale, consumption, or regulation of alcoholic beverages. (4) This section does not prohibit a private club from sponsoring or permitting sports schools or leagues for children less than 18 years of age that are limited by age or to members of 1 sex, if comparable and equally convenient access to the club's facilities is made available to both sexes and if these activities are not used as a subterfuge to evade the purposes of this article. Sec. 402. An educational institution shall not do any of the following: (a) Discriminate against an individual in the full utilization of or benefit from the institution, or the services, activities, or programs provided by the institution because of religion, race, color, national origin, or sex. , sexual orientation, or gender identity or expression. (b) Exclude, expel, limit, or otherwise discriminate against an individual seeking admission as a student or an individual enrolled as a student in the terms, conditions, or privileges of the institution, because of religion, race, color, national origin, or sex. , sexual orientation, or gender identity or expression. (c) For purposes of admission only, make or use a written or oral inquiry or form of application that elicits or attempts to elicit information concerning the religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or marital status of an individual, except as permitted by rule of the commission or as required by federal law, rule, or regulation, or pursuant to an affirmative action program. (d) Print or publish or cause to be printed or published a catalog, notice, or advertisement indicating a preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination based on the religion, race, color, national origin, or sex , sexual orientation, or gender identity or expression, of an applicant for admission to the educational institution. (e) Announce or follow a policy of denial or limitation through a quota or otherwise of educational opportunities of a group or its members because of religion, race, color, national origin, or sex. , sexual orientation, or gender identity or expression. Sec. 502. (1) A person engaging in a real estate transaction, or a real estate broker or salesperson, shall not on the basis of religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, familial status, or marital status of an individual or anyone residing with that individual do any of the following: (a) Refuse to engage in a real estate transaction with a person. (b) Discriminate against a person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of a real estate transaction or in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection with a real estate transaction. (c) Refuse to receive from a person or transmit to a person a bona fide offer to engage in a real estate transaction. (d) Refuse to negotiate for a real estate transaction with a person. (e) Represent to a person that real property is not available for inspection, sale, rental, or lease when in fact it is so available, or knowingly fail to bring a property listing to a person's attention, or refuse to permit a person to inspect real property, or otherwise make unavailable or deny real property to a person. (f) Make, print, circulate, post, mail, or otherwise cause to be made or published a statement, advertisement, notice, or sign, or use a form of application for a real estate transaction, or make a record of inquiry in connection with a prospective real estate transaction, that indicates, directly or indirectly, an intent to make a preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination with respect to the real estate transaction. (g) Offer, solicit, accept, use, or retain a listing of real property with the understanding that a person may be discriminated against in a real estate transaction or in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection with that transaction. (h) Discriminate against a person in the brokering or appraising of real property. (2) A person shall not deny a person access to, or membership or participation in, a multiple listing service, real estate brokers' organization or other service, organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or renting real property or discriminate against the person in the terms or conditions of that access, membership, or participation because of religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, familial status, or marital status. (3) A person that is a landlord of a rental unit shall not, based on the source of income of an otherwise eligible prospective or current tenant, do any of the following: (a) Deny or terminate a tenancy to the prospective or current tenant. (b) Make any distinction, discrimination, or restriction against the prospective or current tenant in the price, terms, conditions, fees, or privileges relating to the rental, lease, or occupancy of a rental unit or in the furnishing of any facilities or services in connection with the rental, lease, or occupancy of the rental unit. (c) Otherwise make unavailable or deny any rental unit to the prospective or current tenant if the prospective or current tenant would be eligible to rent the rental unit but for the individual's source of income. (d) Represent to the prospective tenant that a rental unit is not available for inspection, rental, or lease when in fact it is so available, or knowingly fail to bring a rental listing to the prospective tenant's attention, or refuse to permit the prospective tenant to inspect a rental unit. (e) Make any distinction, discrimination, or restriction against the prospective or current tenant in the price, terms, conditions, fees, or privileges relating to the rental, lease, or occupancy of any rental unit on the basis of the prospective or current tenant's use of emergency rental assistance. (f) If the person is a landlord that requires a prospective or current tenant to have a certain threshold level of income, exclude any source of income in the form of a rent voucher or subsidy when calculating whether the income criteria have been met. This subdivision does not apply to emergency rental assistance. (g) Attempt to discourage the rental or lease of any rental unit to the prospective or current tenant. (h) Publish, circulate, display, or cause to be published, circulated, or displayed any communication, notice, advertisement, or sign of any kind relating to the rental or lease of any rental unit that indicates a preference, limitation, or requirement based on any source of income. (i) Assist, induce, incite, or coerce another person to commit an act or engage in a practice that violates this subsection. (j) Coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interfere with any person in the exercise or enjoyment of, or on account of the person having exercised or enjoyed or having aided or encouraged any other person in the exercise or enjoyment of, any right granted or protected under this subsection. (4) Subsection (3) does not apply to a person if the person, including all related entities to that person, is a landlord of fewer than 5 rental units in this state. As used in this subsection: (a) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, limited liability company, or any other legal entity. (b) "Related entity" means a person that, directly or indirectly, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another person. (5) This section is subject to section 503. (6) As used in this section, "landlord", "tenant", and "rental unit" mean those terms as defined in section 1 of 1972 PA 348, MCL 554.601. Sec. 504. (1) A person to whom application is made for financial assistance or financing in connection with a real estate transaction or in connection with the construction, rehabilitation, repair, maintenance, or improvement of real property, or a representative of that person, shall not do any of the following: (a) Discriminate against the applicant because of the religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, familial status, or marital status of the applicant or an individual residing with the applicant. (b) Use a form of application for financial assistance or financing or make or keep a record or inquiry in connection with an application for financial assistance or financing that indicates, directly or indirectly, a preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination as to the religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, familial status, or marital status of the applicant or an individual residing with the applicant. (2) A person whose business includes engaging in real estate transactions shall not discriminate against a person because of religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, familial status, or marital status, in purchasing loans for acquiring, constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaining a dwelling or in making or purchasing loans or providing other financial assistance secured by residential real estate. (3) Subsection (1)(b) does not apply to a form of application for financial assistance prescribed for the use of a lender regulated as a mortgagee under the national housing act, 12 USC 1701 to 1750g, or by a regulatory board or officer acting under the statutory authority of this state or the United States. Sec. 505. (1) A condition, restriction, or prohibition, including a right of entry or possibility of reverter, that directly or indirectly limits the use or occupancy of real property on the basis of religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, familial status, or marital status is void, except a limitation of use as provided in section 503(1)(c) or on the basis of religion relating to real property held by a religious institution or organization, or by a religious or charitable organization operated, supervised, or controlled by a religious institution or organization, and used for religious or charitable purposes. (2) A person shall not insert in a written instrument relating to real property a provision that is void under this section or honor such a provision in the chain of title. Sec. 506. A person shall not represent, for the purpose of inducing a real estate transaction from which the person may benefit financially, that a change has occurred or will or may occur in the composition with respect to religion, race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, familial status, or marital status of the owners or occupants in the block, neighborhood, or area in which the real property is located, or represent that this change will or may result in the lowering of property values, an increase in criminal or antisocial behavior, or a decline in the quality of schools in the block, neighborhood, or area in which the real property is located.